Idaho statutes. Title 7 SPECIAL PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 7 EMINENT DOMAIN
§ 7-717. Possession by plaintiff — Payment of damages — Appointment of commissioners.

At any time after trial and judgment entered, or pending an appeal from the judgment to the Supreme Court, whenever the plaintiffs shall have paid into the court for the defendant the full amount of the judgment, and such further sum as shall be required by the court as a fund to pay any further damages and costs that may be recovered in said proceedings, as well as all damages that may be sustained by the defendant, if for any cause the property shall not be finally taken for public use, the district court in which the proceeding was tried may, upon notice of not less than ten (10) days, authorize the plaintiff, if already in possession, to continue therein, and if not, to take possession of and use the property during the conclusion of the litigation, and may, if necessary, stay all actions and proceedings against the plaintiff on account thereof.

The defendant who is entitled to the money paid into court for him upon any judgment, shall be entitled to demand and receive the same at any time thereafter, upon obtaining an order therefor from the court. It shall be the duty of the court, or the judge thereof, upon application being made by such defendant, to order and direct that the money so paid into court for him, be delivered to him upon his filing a satisfaction of the judgment, or upon his filing a receipt therefor, and an abandonment of all defenses to the action or proceeding, except as to the amount of damages that he may be entitled to in the event that a new trial shall be granted. A payment to a defendant as aforesaid shall be held to [be] an abandonment by such defendant of all defenses interposed by him, excepting his claim for greater compensation. The court may order the money to be deposited in the county treasury, and in such case it shall be the duty of the treasurer to receive all such moneys, duly receipt for, and safely keep the same, and to pay out such moneys in such manner, and at such times, as the court or judge thereof may direct, and for such duty he shall be liable to the plaintiff upon his official bond; provided further, that at any time after the commencement of proceedings in the district court, as provided for in this chapter, to condemn property, and upon ten (10) days’ notice to the adverse party, the district court or the judge thereof may appoint three (3) disinterested persons, who shall be residents of the county in which the land is situated, as commissioners to assess and determine the damages that the defendant will sustain by reason of the condemnation and appropriation of the property described in the complaint, and the said commissioners shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, take and subscribe an oath to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties as such commissioners. Such commissioners shall, within five (5) days of their appointment, give notice in writing of the time and place where they will meet for the purpose aforesaid, which time shall not be less than five (5) days nor more than ten (10) days from the date of giving said notice, and which place shall be within five (5) miles of the premises aforesaid, unless another time or place is agreed upon by the commissioners and the parties. At the time and place mentioned in such notice they may administer oaths to witnesses, and hear the evidence offered by the parties, and, after viewing the premises, shall report in writing their proceedings and the damages which they find the defendant will sustain by reason of the condemnation and appropriation of said property, which report shall be signed by said commissioners, or a majority thereof, and be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court in which such action shall be pending within ten days of the date of the conclusion of the commissioners’ proceedings unless additional time therefor is granted by the court or judge thereof; and at any time after payment to the defendant of the amount so assessed and found by said commissioners as damages, or in case the defendant shall refuse to receive the same, then at any time after such amount shall be deposited with the clerk of the said court to abide the result of said action, the plaintiff may enter upon, and take possession of and use, the property mentioned in the complaint and do such work thereon as may be required for the easement or title sought according to its nature, until the final conclusion of the litigation concerning the same: provided further, that at the time of making such payment to the defendant of the amount so assessed and found by said commissioners as damages, or in case the defendant shall refuse to receive the same, then at any time after such amount shall be deposited with the clerk of the said court to abide the result of said action, the plaintiff may elect to build the fences, cattle guards and other structures by said commissioners found to be necessary, and may execute to the defendant a bond as provided in Section 7-714[, Idaho Code]. •Title 7»«Ch. 7»«§ 7-717»

§ 7-717. Possession by plaintiff — Payment of damages — Appointment of commissioners.

At any time after trial and judgment entered, or pending an appeal from the judgment to the Supreme Court, whenever the plaintiffs shall have paid into the court for the defendant the full amount of the judgment, and such further sum as shall be required by the court as a fund to pay any further damages and costs that may be recovered in said proceedings, as well as all damages that may be sustained by the defendant, if for any cause the property shall not be finally taken for public use, the district court in which the proceeding was tried may, upon notice of not less than ten (10) days, authorize the plaintiff, if already in possession, to continue therein, and if not, to take possession of and use the property during the conclusion of the litigation, and may, if necessary, stay all actions and proceedings against the plaintiff on account thereof.

§ 7-718. Costs.

Costs may be allowed or not, and, if allowed, may be apportioned between the parties on the same or adverse sides in the discretion of the court.

§ 7-718. Costs.

Costs may be allowed or not, and, if allowed, may be apportioned between the parties on the same or adverse sides in the discretion of the court.

§ 7-719. Rules of practice and appeals. [Repealed.]

§ 7-720. Application to municipalities.

Nothing in this code must be construed to abrogate or repeal any statute provided for the taking of property in any municipality for street purposes. Any municipality at its option may exercise the right of eminent domain under the provisions of this chapter for any of the uses and purposes mentioned in section 7-701, Idaho Code.

§ 7-721. Possession by plaintiff pending trial.

In any proceeding under the provisions of this chapter for the acquisition of real property, the plaintiff may take possession of and use such property at any time after just compensation has been judicially determined and payment thereof made into court. Judicial determination shall be satisfied by the following requirements:

At any time after an action for condemnation has been commenced under the provisions of this chapter and after the defendant has made an appearance, the plaintiff may file a motion asking that said plaintiff be placed in lawful possession of and have the use of said property and the court shall fix a date, not less than ten (10) or more than twenty (20) days after the filing of such motion, for the hearing thereon and shall require due notice to be given to each party to the proceedings whose interest would be affected by the requested taking. Notice herein shall be given as provided in rule 5(a) or 5(b), as the case may be, of the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

At the hearing the court shall first determine whether or not plaintiff (a) has the right of eminent domain, (b) whether or not the use to which the property is to be applied is a use authorized by law, (c) whether or not the taking is necessary to such use, and (d) whether or not plaintiff has sought, in good faith, to purchase the lands sought to be taken and the court shall enter an order thereon which shall be a final order as to these issues and an appeal may be taken therefrom; provided, however, no appeal therefrom shall stay further proceedings.

If the matters in the preceding subsection are determined in favor of the plaintiff the court shall hear the issues raised by the plaintiff’s motion for taking and shall receive such evidence as it may consider necessary and proper for a finding of just compensation, but the court may limit the number of witnesses presented by any party to the action, and, in its discretion, may appoint a disinterested appraiser as an agent of the court to evaluate the property to which the motion relates and to report his conclusions to the court within ten (10) days from the date of his appointment; and the court shall fix his fee which shall be paid by the plaintiff. The court shall within five (5) days after the hearing, or if it shall appoint an appraiser, within five (5) days after receiving his report, make an order of determination of just compensation.

Neither the order of the court determining just compensation, nor the amount of the deposit, nor the report of the appraiser appointed by the court shall be admissible in evidence in further proceedings under this section.

After the court has entered its order of determination of the amount of just compensation, the plaintiff may deposit such amount with the court and the court shall thereupon enter an order fixing a date from which the plaintiff shall be entitled to take possession of and use the property. After such deposit and order have been made the cause shall proceed to trial in the regular manner.

Any party defendant may file with the court an application to withdraw his share of the amount deposited by the plaintiff. Such application may be filed at any time after the court has entered its order placing plaintiff in possession and use of the property. If there be only one (1) defendant in the action, the court shall authorize the requested withdrawal of funds, but if there shall be more than one (1) defendant the court shall fix a date for hearing on the application to withdraw funds and shall require notice to be given to each party whose interest would be affected by such withdrawal. After hearing the court shall determine the share of the funds deposited to which the defendants or any of them are lawfully entitled and shall authorize the withdrawal requested or such part thereof as shall be proper. •Title 7»«Ch. 7»«§ 7-721•

If the defendant has not appeared, but is not in default, plaintiff may proceed as herein provided twenty (20) days after the action shall have been commenced by serving the motion and notice of the hearing in the same manner as required for service of summons.

§ 7-721. Possession by plaintiff pending trial.

In any proceeding under the provisions of this chapter for the acquisition of real property, the plaintiff may take possession of and use such property at any time after just compensation has been judicially determined and payment thereof made into court. Judicial determination shall be satisfied by the following requirements:

At any time after an action for condemnation has been commenced under the provisions of this chapter and after the defendant has made an appearance, the plaintiff may file a motion asking that said plaintiff be placed in lawful possession of and have the use of said property and the court shall fix a date, not less than ten (10) or more than twenty (20) days after the filing of such motion, for the hearing thereon and shall require due notice to be given to each party to the proceedings whose interest would be affected by the requested taking. Notice herein shall be given as provided in rule 5(a) or 5(b), as the case may be, of the Idaho rules of civil procedure.

At the hearing the court shall first determine whether or not plaintiff (a) has the right of eminent domain, (b) whether or not the use to which the property is to be applied is a use authorized by law, (c) whether or not the taking is necessary to such use, and (d) whether or not plaintiff has sought, in good faith, to purchase the lands sought to be taken and the court shall enter an order thereon which shall be a final order as to these issues and an appeal may be taken therefrom; provided, however, no appeal therefrom shall stay further proceedings.

If the matters in the preceding subsection are determined in favor of the plaintiff the court shall hear the issues raised by the plaintiff’s motion for taking and shall receive such evidence as it may consider necessary and proper for a finding of just compensation, but the court may limit the number of witnesses presented by any party to the action, and, in its discretion, may appoint a disinterested appraiser as an agent of the court to evaluate the property to which the motion relates and to report his conclusions to the court within ten (10) days from the date of his appointment; and the court shall fix his fee which shall be paid by the plaintiff. The court shall within five (5) days after the hearing, or if it shall appoint an appraiser, within five (5) days after receiving his report, make an order of determination of just compensation.

Neither the order of the court determining just compensation, nor the amount of the deposit, nor the report of the appraiser appointed by the court shall be admissible in evidence in further proceedings under this section.

After the court has entered its order of determination of the amount of just compensation, the plaintiff may deposit such amount with the court and the court shall thereupon enter an order fixing a date from which the plaintiff shall be entitled to take possession of and use the property. After such deposit and order have been made the cause shall proceed to trial in the regular manner.

Any party defendant may file with the court an application to withdraw his share of the amount deposited by the plaintiff. Such application may be filed at any time after the court has entered its order placing plaintiff in possession and use of the property. If there be only one (1) defendant in the action, the court shall authorize the requested withdrawal of funds, but if there shall be more than one (1) defendant the court shall fix a date for hearing on the application to withdraw funds and shall require notice to be given to each party whose interest would be affected by such withdrawal. After hearing the court shall determine the share of the funds deposited to which the defendants or any of them are lawfully entitled and shall authorize the withdrawal requested or such part thereof as shall be proper.
(7) If more than eighty percent (80%) of the amount deposited is withdrawn, the defendant or defendants making the withdrawal shall be required to make a written undertaking, executed by two (2) or more sufficient sureties, approved by the court, to the effect that they are bound to the plaintiff for the payment to it of such sum by which the amount withdrawn shall exceed the amount of the award finally determined upon trial of the cause.

If the defendant has not appeared, but is not in default, plaintiff may proceed as herein provided twenty (20) days after the action shall have been commenced by serving the motion and notice of the hearing in the same manner as required for service of summons.

(8) Upon trial of the cause the court shall enter judgment against the plaintiff for the amount of the award, and the plaintiff shall pay to the defendant or defendants the amount, if any, by which such judgment exceeds the amount previously deposited; provided that if the award and judgment shall be less than the amount withdrawn under subsection (6) of this section, the defendant or defendants shall refund the difference to the clerk of the court and if such refund is not made within thirty (30) days the court shall enter judgment in favor of the plaintiff and against such defendant or defendants for the amount of the difference.

(9) After plaintiff has deposited with the court the amount determined by the court to be just compensation, no interest shall accrue on the amount so deposited.